West Virginia, session 2025, HB2200.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §20-5-18. Discounts for West Virginia residents, and Discounts for Current Employees of the West Virginia Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation at campgrounds and state golf courses and Discounts discounts for West Virginia residents over the age of 62. (a) The director shall provide to West Virginia citizens, and who document residency by a valid West Virginia driver's license, a 25 percent reduction in campground rental fees for each campsite to be used exclusively by said eligible camper: Provided, That the 25 percent reduction in campground rental fees shall only apply to those rentals occurring during the period of time beginning on the day after Labor Day and ending four days prior to Memorial Day: Provided, however, That a 15 percent reduction in campground rental fees shall apply to those rentals occurring during the period of time beginning on the four days prior to Memorial Day and ending on Labor Day. (b) The director shall provide to all employees of the West Virginia Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation, and who document employment as a correctional officer with the West Virginia Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation, a 50 percent reduction in campground rental fees for each campsite to be used exclusively by said eligible camper.  The director shall provide to all employees of the West Virginia Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation, a 50 percent reduction in green fees and a 50 percent reduction in cart fees at any golf course managed or under the control of the West Virginia Division of Natural Resources. (c) The director shall provide to West Virginia citizens who are 62 years of age or older, and who document residency and age by a valid West Virginia driver's license, a 50% reduction in campground rental fees for each campsite to be used exclusively by said eligible camper: Provided, That the fifty percent reduction in campground rental fees shall only apply to those rentals occurring during the period of time beginning on the day after Labor Day and ending four days prior to Memorial day: Provided, however, That a 25 percent reduction in campground rental fees shall apply to those rentals occurring during the period of time beginning on the four days prior to Memorial Day and ending on Labor Day.